Colorado statutes. TITLE 17 Corrections
ARTICLE 42
MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

Section

17-42-101. Freedom of worship.

All persons who are confined to a correctional facility as defined in section 17-1-102 shall have the right to worship according to the dictates of their consciences, and such persons shall be afforded a reasonable opportunity to freely exercise their religious beliefs without fear of retaliation or discrimination for the free exercise thereof. The practice of religion by any particular sect may not be curtailed or prohibited unless such practices threaten the reasonable security interests of the correctional facility.

Upon the request of any inmate, and to the extent practicable and consistent with reasonable security considerations, religious facilities shall be made available in a nondiscriminatory manner. Services shall be held and advice and ministration given within the buildings or grounds of the correctional facility where the inmate is confined. Attendance at any services so provided shall be voluntary.

The department shall permit access to objects of a religious nature where possession of such objects would not unduly burden the reasonable security interests of the correctional facility. Prison officials shall accord appropriate respect for sacred objects. When the reasonable security interests of the correctional facility necessitate the inspection of any sacred object, such inspection shall be done visually.

In order to provide for and attend to the spiritual needs of inmates, the department shall permit inmates to consult with and receive spiritual advice and ministration from a spiritual leader.

This section shall not require the department of corrections to construct additional facilities, remodel or reconfigure existing structures, or hire additional employees to meet the directives of this section.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article added, p. 250, § 1, effective May 26.

17-42-102. American Indians - freedom of worship - definitions.

The general assembly hereby finds, determines, and declares that American Indian religions and religious beliefs predate the creation of the United States constitution; however, understanding of and respect for American Indian religious practices is not widespread among non-indigenous persons. The general assembly further finds that serious problems in the practice of religious freedom persist for the American Indian and particularly for American Indians who are incarcerated. Therefore, in order to protect this most basic freedom for American Indians who are incarcerated, traditional religious and ceremonial practices of American Indians should be permitted in correctional facilities to the extent that such practices do not impinge on the reasonable security interests of the correctional facilities to which such Indians are confined.

American Indians who are confined to a correctional facility as defined in section 17-1-102 and who practice an American Indian religion as defined in subsection (5) of this section shall have access on a regular basis to the following:

American Indian traditional spiritual leaders;

Items and materials utilized in religious ceremonies; and

American Indian religious facilities.

Access of American Indians to spiritual leaders, religious items and materials, and religious facilities shall be comparable to access to clergy, religious items and materials, and religious facilities which is afforded to inmates who practice Judeo-Christian religions.

The provisions of this section shall not be construed as requiring prison authorities to permit or prohibit access to peyote or American Indian religious sites.

For purposes of this section:

"American Indian" means an individual of aboriginal ancestry who is a member of an Indian tribe. "American Indian" includes any individual who is an Alaska native or any individual who is a native Hawaiian.

"American Indian religion" means any religion which is practiced by American Indians and the origin and interpretation of which is from a traditional American Indian culture or community.

"Indian tribe" means any tribe, band, nation, or other organized group or community of Indians, including any Alaska native village as defined in the "Alaska Native Claims Settlement Act", federal Public Law 92-203, as amended, which is recognized as eligible for the special programs and services provided by the United States to Indians because of their status as Indians.

"Native Hawaiian" means any individual who is a descendant of the aboriginal people who, prior to 1778, occupied and exercised sovereignty in the area that now comprises the state of Hawaii.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article added, p. 251, § 1, effective May 26.

Editor's note:

Subsections (5)(b), (5)(c), and (5)(d), as enacted by Senate Bill 92-197, were relettered on revision in 2004 to conform with statutory alphabetization format.

17-42-103. Policies concerning inmates' use of telephones - excessive rates prohibited - transparency of communications services in correctional facilities - report - definitions.

In administering the use of telephones by inmates in any state or private prison facility, the department shall not receive any commission from the penal communications service provider except as much as is necessary to pay for calling costs and the direct and indirect costs incurred by the department in managing the calling system. For the purposes of this subsection (1), "direct and indirect costs incurred by the department in managing the calling system" includes costs related to the provision of security and monitoring systems by either the department or the penal communications service provider.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Commission" means any form of monetary payment, thing of value, in-kind payment, gift, exchange of services or goods, fee other than for direct cost recovery, or technology allowance paid to a correctional facility or other government entity by a penal communications service provider.

"Correctional facility" means any building, structure, enclosure, institution, or place, whether permanent or temporary, fixed or mobile, where persons are or may be lawfully held in custody or confined and that is operated by a city, county, city and county, state government, or private entity, including but not limited to a jail or prison.

"Fee" means any amount of money charged to a person for the use of penal communications services in addition to rates. A fee includes extra charges for initiating a call, opening an account, having an account, funding an account, inactivity, closing an account, getting a refund, or receiving a paper bill.

"Penal communications service provider" means a person or company that provides penal communications services.

"Penal communications services" means communications services, including telephone services provided to a correctional facility for use by end users.

"Quarter" means the period of time between the reporting dates of January 1, April 1, July 1, and October 1 of each year.

"Rate" means any predetermined per-minute cost set by the penal communications service provider for the use of penal communications services.

"Revenue" means the money collected from users of communications services.

"Underlying carrier" means a communications service provider that contracts with a penal communications service provider that has entered into a contract to provide communications services to a correctional facility.

Each penal telecommunications service provider shall maintain the records and data specified in this subsection (3)(a) for each correctional facility to which it provides penal communications services. A communications service provider that serves as an underlying carrier is not required to maintain or produce the records and data specified in this subsection (3)(a). On or before January 1, 2022, each penal communications service provider shall submit such records and data in a report to the public utilities commission within fourteen days after the end of each quarter. Except as provided in subsection (3)(b) of this section, the quarterly reports submitted pursuant to this subsection (3)(a) must include:

A copy of the existing contract between the penal communications service provider and the government entity to provide penal communications services to persons in custody in a correctional facility;

The total number of calls made from the correctional facility using the service;

The total minutes for calls made from the correctional facility using the service;

The revenue collected by the penal communications service provider for providing the services;

A summary of all commissions paid to the correctional facility or any other government entity by the penal communications service provider;

A copy of the penal communications service provider's unclaimed funds policy;

The rates charged by the penal communications service provider to persons in custody making telephone calls to persons not in custody, including any rates charged for:

The first minute of an in-state call;

Minutes subsequent to the first minute of an in-state call;

The first minute of an out-of-state call; and

Minutes subsequent to the first minute of an out-of-state call;

All fees charged to persons in custody making telephone calls to persons not in custody, including fees charged to:

Initiate a call;

Deposit money into the incarcerated person's account for communications services;

Open, maintain, fund, or close an account with a penal communications service provider;

Receive a refund from a penal communications service provider;

Receive a paper bill from a penal communications service provider; and

Make payments to the penal communications service provider through a third-party company; and

The total number of consumer complaints related to video quality.

A penal communications service provider is not obligated to provide the public utilities commission with each specific record or data required by subsection (3)(a) of this section if the specific record or data has not changed since the report was submitted in the previous quarter.

No later than thirty days after receipt of the information required by subsection (3) of this section, the public utilities commission shall publish such information on its website in a format that is accessible by the public.

Starting on January 1, 2022, rate caps established by the federal communications commission apply to all in-state debit, prepaid, and collect calls to or from a correctional facility.

To ensure accountability for potential predatory practices by penal communications service providers and to determine the quality of calls to and from correctional facilities, the public utilities commission shall conduct trial tests on a statistically valid sample of penal communications services, document the test results and any subsequent remedial actions taken by the public utilities commission or the penal communications service providers, and consolidate the information into an annual written report published on its website in a format that is accessible by the public.

The public utilities commission shall comply with the following steps when conducting trial tests of penal communications services:

Tests must include trial telephone calls to staff phone numbers not already in the provider's system;

Tests must be conducted biannually to monitor the cost and quality of calls, including how the penal communications service provider is charging and addressing consumer complaints regarding poor quality calls, including dropped calls; and

Tests may be conducted remotely. All correctional facilities shall cooperate with the public utilities commission in conducting tests of penal communications services.

Penal communications service providers shall include the following language prominently on their website: "The public utilities commission (PUC) gives consumers the opportunity to file informal complaints about problems with the communications services that the PUC regulates. Complaints can be filed through https://puc.colorado.gov".

Nothing in this subsection (5) limits or restricts the public utilities commission's authority to regulate rates and charges, correct abuses, or prevent unjust discrimination.

Source:

L. 2015:

Entire section added, (SB 15-195), ch. 279, p. 1145, § 2, effective August 5.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (HB 21-1201), ch. 389, p. 2595, § 1, effective June 30.

L. 2022:

(5)(d) amended, (SB 22-212), ch. 421, p. 2991, § 106, effective August 10.

17-42-104. Inmates incarcerated in other states - notifications to victims required - exceptions - definitions.

If the department determines that an inmate is eligible for relocation to a penal institution in another state pursuant to the "Interstate Corrections Compact", part 16 of article 60 of title 24, then not later than twenty-four hours after such determination, the department shall notify the prosecuting attorney and any registered victim of one or more crimes for which the inmate is serving his or her sentence that:

Such a determination has been made; and

If the inmate is relocated, the department, pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, may be required to notify the prosecuting attorney and any registered victim of one or more crimes for which the inmate is serving his or her sentence of the name and location of the penal institution where the inmate is to be housed for any period of time.

If the department relocates an inmate for incarceration or contracts with another state for the incarceration of an inmate in a penal institution in another state, then not later than forty-eight hours after such relocation, the department shall notify the prosecuting attorney and any registered victim of one or more crimes for which the inmate is serving his or her sentence of the name and location of the penal institution where the inmate is to be housed for any period of time.

Subsection (2) of this section does not apply if any of the following factors apply and the prosecuting attorney confirms such fact in writing as described in subsection (4)(b) of this section:

The inmate is a witness and the executive director determines that disclosing the location of the inmate would pose a risk to the personal safety of the inmate, corrections staff, other inmates, or facilities;

The prosecuting attorney requests in writing that the department not disclose the location of the penal institution where the inmate is located;

The registered victim is currently incarcerated; or

The inmate has been employed by the department or as a law enforcement officer and the executive director determines that disclosing the location of the inmate poses a risk to the personal safety of the inmate, corrections staff, other inmates, or facilities.

If the department relocates an inmate and the executive director determines that any factor described in subsection (3) of this section applies, then not later than forty-eight hours after such relocation, the department shall notify the prosecuting attorney:

That the inmate has been relocated; and

Which of the factors described in subsection (3) of this section the executive director has determined applies.

If the prosecuting attorney agrees with the executive director's determination that a factor described in subsection (3) of this section applies, then:

The prosecuting attorney shall confirm the executive director's determination in writing;

The department shall retain such written confirmation; and

The department shall notify any registered victim of one or more crimes for which the inmate is serving his or her sentence that the inmate has been relocated and the department is unable to disclose the inmate's location because one of the factors described in subsection (3) of this section applies.

If the prosecuting attorney disagrees with the executive director's determination that a factor applies, then the executive director has thirty days to review the notice of disagreement. If, after such review, the executive director still determines that a factor applies and the inmate's location should not be disclosed, the department shall notify the prosecutor of such fact and notify any registered victims that the prosecutor disagrees with the executive director's determination.

Either the prosecutor or any registered victim of the inmate may bring an action in the district court from which the inmate's sentence was issued for the court to determine whether a substantial basis existed and still exists to support the executive director's determination. If the district court finds that no substantial basis exists, the executive director shall disclose the inmate's location to any registered victims, as described in subsection (2) of this section. Any hearing conducted for the purpose of this subsection (4)(c)(II) must be held in camera.

In an action brought pursuant to this subsection (4)(c), the parties are entitled to full discovery under the Colorado rules of civil procedure that are applicable to actions for declaratory judgment; except that the executive director is not required to disclose the location of the inmate pending the resolution of the civil action and any appeals. Any appeal of a judgment from an action brought under this subsection (4)(c) must be made pursuant to the rules of appellate procedure.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Law enforcement officer" means a peace officer described in article 2.5 of title 16.

"Prosecuting attorney" means the office of the district attorney or other prosecutor who prosecuted an offender who was subsequently convicted and incarcerated.

"Registered victim" means a victim who has registered with the victims services unit within the department.

"Victim" has the same meaning as set forth in section 24-4.1-302 (5).

"Witness" has the same meaning as set forth in section 24-4.1-302 (7).

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire section added, (SB 18-014), ch. 151, p. 946, § 2, effective April 23.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 18-014, see section 1 of chapter 151, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.